Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 227,713
(2) Extraordinary expenses ............ $ 18,226
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House May 2, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 1